Louisiana, session 2026, HB20.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:710.1(A)(1)(a) and (c) and (C)(1) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§710.1. Employment of retirees who retired on or after July 1, 2020
A. Except as otherwise provided in this Section, any retiree who returns to
active service with an employer covered by the provisions of this Chapter and who
retired on or after July 1, 2020, shall for that period of employment choose one of the
following irrevocable options, which shall be made in writing and filed with the
appropriate officer of the employer:
(1) Option 1. (a) Any retiree may be employed in any position covered by
this system during any fiscal year, provided that his earnings in such employment do
not exceed twenty-five one hundred percent of his final average compensation during
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-493 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 20
any fiscal year. If actual earnings exceed this amount in any fiscal year, the benefits
payable to the retiree shall be reduced by the amount in excess of twenty-five one
hundred percent of his final average compensation.
* * *
(c) Any retiree employed in a full-time position exercising Option 1 as
provided in this Paragraph may prospectively exercise Option 2 any time prior to or
after reaching twenty-five one hundred percent of his final average compensation.
In such case, all employee contributions made in accordance with this Paragraph
prior to the exercise of Option 2 shall be refunded at that time. If a retiree has earned
in excess of twenty-five one hundred percent of his final average compensation prior
to an election made pursuant to this Subparagraph, the employee contributions
eligible for refund or the benefits payable to the retiree shall be reduced by said
amount.
* * *
C.(1) Any retiree who returns to active service covered by the provisions of
this Chapter within the twelve-month three-month period immediately following the
effective date of such retirement shall have his retirement benefits suspended for the
duration of such active service or the lapse of twelve three months from the effective
date of his retirement, whichever occurs first, even if such service is based on
employment by contract or corporate contract.
* * *
Section 2. The cost of this Act, if any, shall be funded with additional employer
contributions in compliance with Article X, Section 29(F) of the Constitution of Louisiana.